Missouri, session 2026, HB3519.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.205, to read as follows:
407.205. 1. It shall be unlawful for any business that makes an automatic
renewal offer or continuous service offer to a consumer in this state to:
(1) Fail to present the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer
terms in a clear and conspicuous manner before the subscription or purchasing
agreement is fulfilled and in visual proximity, or temporal proximity if the offer is
conveyed by voice, to the request for consent to the offer. If the offer also includes a gift
or free trial, the offer shall include a clear and conspicuous explanation of the price that
shall be charged after the trial ends or the manner in which the subscription or
purchasing agreement pricing shall change upon conclusion of the trial;
(2) Charge a consumer's credit card, debit card, or account with a third party
for an automatic renewal or continuous service without first obtaining the consumer's
affirmative consent to the agreement containing the automatic renewal offer terms or
continuous service offer terms, including the terms of an automatic renewal offer or
continuous service offer that is made at a promotional or discounted price for a limited
period of time; or
(3) Fail to provide an acknowledgment that includes the automatic renewal offer
terms or continuous service offer terms, cancellation policy, and information regarding
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3519 2
how to cancel in a manner that the consumer is able to retain. If the automatic renewal
offer or continuous service offer includes a gift or free trial, the business shall also
disclose in the acknowledgment how to cancel, and allow the consumer to cancel, the
automatic renewal or continuous service before the consumer pays for the goods or
services.
2. A business that makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer
shall provide at least one of the following:
(1) A toll-free telephone number;
(2) An email address;
(3) A postal address if the seller directly bills the consumer; or
(4) Other cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for cancellation.

The business shall clearly and conspicuously display such contact mechanism in the
acknowledgment, subscription, and purchasing agreement described under this section.
3. A consumer who accepts an automatic renewal or continuous service offer
shall be allowed to terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service through any
of the cancellation mechanisms described under subsection 2 of this section, which may
include a termination email formatted and provided by the business that a consumer
may send to the business without additional information.
4. In the case of a material change in the terms of the automatic renewal or
continuous service accepted by a consumer in this state, the business shall provide the
consumer with a clear and conspicuous written notice of the material change and shall
provide information regarding how to cancel in a manner that the consumer is able to
retain.
5. The requirements of this section shall apply only prior to the completion of the
initial order for the automatic renewal or continuous service, except:
(1) The requirement in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section may be
fulfilled after completion of the initial order; and
(2) The requirement in subsection 4 of this section shall be fulfilled prior to
implementation of the material change.
6. (1) The attorney general may commence a civil action to recover a civil
penalty in a court of competent jurisdiction against any business that violates this
section or that commits a deceptive act or practice by failing to provide a simple
mechanism for a consumer to cancel the automatic renewal of the subscription or
purchasing agreement. In such an action, the business shall be liable for a civil penalty
of at least fifty thousand dollars for each violation.

HB 3519 3
(2) The attorney general shall have all powers, rights, and duties regarding
violations of this section as are provided in sections 407.010 to 407.130, in addition to
rulemaking authority under section 407.145.
✔